Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-120] Time of examinations.
(a) The commissioner shall give examinations within this State at such times
and places as may reasonably serve the convenience of both the commissioner and
applicants.

(b) The commissioner may require a waiting period
of not more than six months before giving a new examination to an applicant who
has failed to pass two previous, similar examinations. [L 2001, c 216, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next